Hawaii, session 2026, HB1904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  Hawaii Orbital Sustainability and Space Traffic Management §201-A  Short title.  This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Hawaii Orbital Sustainability and Space Traffic Management Act". §201-B  Purpose. The purpose of this part is to: (1)  Promote safe, responsible, and sustainable space operations; (2)  Establish state coordination and oversight for orbital traffic and orbital debris mitigation; (3)  Support research, workforce development, and public‑private partnerships in space operations; and (4)  Ensure compliance with environmental and cultural standards in the State. §201-C  Definitions.  For the purposes of this part: "Aerospace activities" means the design, launch, operation, and recovery of aircraft, satellites, spacecraft, launch systems, or related technologies. "Board" means the Hawaii orbital sustainability and space traffic board. "Launch corridor" means designated airspace or property approved by the board for aerospace operations. "Operator" means any person or entity conducting aerospace activities from, or affecting, the State's airspace or facilities. "Orbital debris" means non-functional human-made objects in orbit, including decommissioned satellites and fragments that pose a collision risk. §201-D  Hawaii orbital sustainability and space traffic board; establishment.  (a)  There is established within the department of business, economic development, and tourism the Hawaii orbital sustainability and space traffic board. (b)  The board shall comprise the following members or their designees: (1)  The director of business, economic development, and tourism, who shall serve as chairperson; (2)  The president of the university of Hawaii; (3)  The superintendent of education; (4)  The director of labor and industrial relations; (5)  The executive director of the Pacific international space center for exploration systems; and (6)  Three private-sector aerospace experts invited to participate by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and whose terms shall be subject to section 26-34. Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties. (c)  In addition to any other powers or duties provided in this part, the board shall: (1)  Approve and oversee all state-supported space operations programs utilizing public moneys; (2)  Establish and maintain an orbital tracking and space traffic coordination system for the State; (3)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for operator registration, orbital debris mitigation, and enforcement; (4)  Coordinate with federal agencies, including the Federal Aviation Administration, National Aeronautics and Space Administration, and United States Space Force; and (5)  Submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to each regular session that includes, at a minimum, the information described in section 201-I for the preceding year. §201-E  Operator registration; compliance.  (a)  All operators shall register with the board prior to conducting any aerospace activity affecting the State's airspace. (b)  Registration shall include submission of: (1)  A detailed mission plan, subject to standards established by the board, including launch dates, orbital parameters, and an end-of-life disposal strategy; (2)  A debris mitigation plan pursuant to Federal Aviation Administration regulations and international guidelines; and (3)  Proof of insurance or financial liability for potential damages. (c)  The board may deny an operator's registration or suspend operations for noncompliance with any provision of this section. §201-F  Orbital tracking and traffic management system.  (a)  The board shall establish, maintain, and operate a state orbital tracking and traffic management system; provided that the board may award contracts pursuant to chapter 103D for these purposes. (b)  The orbital tracking and traffic management system shall: (1)  Monitor and track active satellites and debris in orbit over the State; (2)  Issue collision warnings; (3)  Coordinate with and provide guidance to operators; and (4)  Maintain data consistent with Federal Aviation Administration reporting requirements and international guidelines. (c)  Operators shall comply with all guidance issued by the board to avoid collisions and mitigate debris. §201-G  Research; workforce development; education programs.  (a)  In coordination with the Pacific international space center for exploration systems, the board shall award and administer grants supporting: (1)  Orbital debris removal and mitigation technologies; (2)  Space situational awareness systems; (3)  Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education and workforce training programs; and (4)  Public-private aerospace research partnerships. (b)  Grants awarded pursuant to subsection (a) shall include measurable milestones and annual reporting requirements. §201-H  Environmental and cultural compliance.  All aerospace operations and projects funded or approved pursuant to this part shall: (1)  Comply with chapter 343; (2)  Respect Native Hawaiian cultural sites and comply with historic preservation program requirements, including consultation requirements under chapter 6E; and (3)  Comply with all debris mitigation standards and requirements. §201-I  Accountability; reporting requirement.  (a) The board shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to each regular session, which shall include: (1)  A list of registered operators and a summary of each operator's activities; (2)  Description of debris incidents that occurred or collision warnings issued; (3)  Outcomes of research, education, and workforce development programs; and (4)  An analysis of environmental and cultural compliance. (b)  The board shall maintain a publicly accessible database of orbital activities and compliance actions. §201-J  Enforcement.  A violation of any provision of this part may result in: (1)  Suspension or revocation of an operator's registration; (2)  Forfeiture of state grant funding; and (3)  Debarment from state-supported programs for not more than three years. (b)  The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as necessary to implement this part." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of section 1 of this Act, including: (1)  The establishment and operation of the orbital tracking and traffic management system; (2)  Disbursement of grants for research, education, and workforce development programs; and (3)  Administrative costs. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________